07_Project/apertium-clt.clt.lexd
##Adverbs
#TODO: distinguish between post-verbal and elsewhere
LEXICON Adv
atahing<adv>:atahing #now
avuochaning<adv>:avuochaning #yesterday
cipari<adv>:cipari #regularly, routinely
diy<adv>:diy #completely
dyi<adv>:dyi #only
duvsaa<adv>:duvsaa #slowly
hmuo<adv>:hmuo #even
mawluo<adv>:mawluo #tomorrow
pariy<adv>:pariy #always
ra<adv>:ra #also
tli<adv>:tli #already/yet/anymore

PATTERNS
#NAgrIV
#NAgrIV[-no-a] [+a<mid>:a]
#NAgrNeg
#NAgrTV

#PATTERN NAgrIV
#[subj<agr>:] NAgrIVpos(1) [<sg>:]
#[subj<agr>:] NAgrIVpos(1):NAgrIVpos(2) [<pl>:]

LEXICON NAgrIVpos(2)
<p1>:i[no-a] :ima
<p2>:na      :niema
<p3>:a       :ama

#LEXICON NAgrNeg
#va<neg>:va
#subj<agr><p1><sg>:ang
#va<neg>+subj<agr><p1><sg>:vang
#subj<agr><p1><pl>:puv
#subj<agr><p2>:ciy
#subj<agr><p2><pl>:ung
#subj<agr><p2><pl>+la<imp>:ungla
#subj<agr><p2><pl>:ungciy
#va<neg>+subj<agr><p3><sg>:vyi
#va<neg>+subj<agr><p3><sg>:vayi
#subj<agr><p3><sg>:yi

#LEXICON NAgrTV
#obj<agr><p1><sg>:na
#obj<agr><p2>:ca

LEXICON NAgr
##Overt pronouns
#Affirmative and negative
kama<p1><sg>:kama #1sg
nama<p2><sg>:nama #2sg
a<p3><sg>:a #3sg
kiema<p1><pl>:kiema #1pl
niema<p2><pl>:niema #2pl
ama<p3><pl>:ama #3pl

pron<prn><p3><pl>:iema

##Transitive verb agreement paradigm
#Affirmative
#Subject
i<agr><p1><sg>:i #1sg.subj.agr
na<agr><p2><sg>:na #2sg.subj.agr
na<agr><p2><sg>+a<mid>:naa
ciy<agr><p2><sg>:ciy #2sg.subj.agr
a<agr><p3><sg>:a #3sg.subj.agr
ima<agr><p1><pl>:ima #1pl.subj.agr
niema<agr><p2><pl>:niema #2pl.subj.agr
ung\ciy<agr><p2><pl>:ung\ciy #ung ciy #2pl.subj.agr
yi<agr><p3><pl>:yi #3pl.subj.agr
ama<agr><p3><pl>:ama #3pl.subj.agr

yi<agr><p3><pl>+te<cnjcoo>:yite
va<neg>+yi<agr><p3><pl>:vayi

#subj<agr><p1><sg>+obj<agr><p2><sg>:ica

#Transitive verb agreement paradigm
#Affirmative
#Object pronouns
ina<agr><o1><sg>:ina #1sg.obj.agr
ca<agr><o2><sg>:ca #2sg.obj.agr
#ø<agr><o1><sg>:ø #3sg.obj.agr
malie<agr><o1><pl>:malie #1pl.obj.agr
yi<agr><o2><pl>:yi #2pl.obj.agr
yi<agr><o3><pl>:yi #3pl.obj.agr

yi<agr><o2><pl>+te<cnjcoo>:yite
yi<agr><o3><pl>+te<cnjcoo>:yite

##Transitive verb agreement paradigm
#Negative
#Object
na<agr><o1><sg><neg>:na #1sg.obj.agr
ca<agr><o2><sg><neg>:ca #2sg.obj.agr
#ø<agr><o3><sg><neg>:ø #3sg.obj.agr
malie<agr><o1><pl><neg>:malie #1pl.obj.agr
yi<agr><o2><pl><neg>:yi #2pl.obj.agr
yi<agr><o3><pl><neg>:yi #3pl.obj.agr

##Transitive verb agreement paradigm
#Negative
#Subject
#va<neg>:va
#va<neg>+subj<agr><p1><sg>:vang
#subj<agr><p1><sg>:ang
#subj<agr><p2>:ciy
#va<neg>+subj<agr><p3><sg>:viy #3sg.subj.agr.not
#subj<agr><p1><pl>:puv
#subj<agr><p2><pl>:ung
#subj<agr><p3><pl>:yi

#subj<agr><p3>+obj<agr><p2>:aca
#subj<agr><p3>+obj<agr><p2>+a<mid>:acaa



##Closed class morphemes
LEXICON ClosedClass
ma<qp>:ma
ma<det><def>:ma
va<neg>:va
pa<nmlz>:pa
pa<ben>:pa #benefactive
pa<nmlz>+ta<cnjsub>:pata
tapata<cnjsub>:tapata #as that ? #TODO: POS, analyze further?
khata<adv>:khata #like that ? #TODO: POS
tiyta<adv>:tiyta #as that ? #TODO: POS
te<fut>:te
taw<pst><hab><asp>:taw
nguoluo<prog><asp>:nguoluo
buo<asp>:buo
aa<irr>:aa
'a<irr>:'a				#<<<review
na<foc>:na
ca<top>:ca 
ta<pr>+na<pr>:tana #TODO: check
ca<pr>+ta<pr>:cata #TODO: check
ca<pr>+pa<nmlz>:capa #TODO: check
hing<det><dem>:hing
lie<loc><post>:lie
luo<loc><post>:luo #locative 
li<neg>:li #NEG in subordinate clauses
li<neg>+pa<nmlz>:lipa
aa<irr>:aa
laa<comp>:laa #than/comparative particle
ce<sup>:ce #most/superlative
vie<comp>:vie #more/comparative
khah<neg><imp>:khah #negative imperative/not
nakaw:nakaw #therefore			<<<review
kie:kie #if/either			<<<review
thi:thi #please				<<<review
hne<cnjcoo>:hne #and
cuorasala<cnjsub>:cuorasala #however
kieca<cnjsub>:kieca #[something conditional]
nakawta<cnjsub>:nakawta #because
cacuonakawta<cnjsub>:cacuonakawta #because [sentence-initial]
tahematapakieca<cnjsub>:tahematapakieca #thus
zaw<grp>:zaw
tie<grp>:tie
se<part><imp>:se
taata<pr>:taata #from/with #TODO: POS
riypata<pr>:riypata #for #TODO: POS
riypa<pr>:riypa #for #TODO: POS
kaw<pr>:kaw #about  #TODO: POS
pakhaa<adv>:pakhaa #again
cakhutaata<adv>:cakhutaata #after that
thueta<pr>:thueta #because of
hingpa<det>:hingpa #this #TODO: POS
cuose<part><juss>:cuose #let it be
hneta<pr>:hneta #with
aw<aff>:aw #affirmative response [sentence initial]
tuv<nmlz>:tuv #nominalizer
te<cvb>:te #converb [connects two verbs?]
sa<emph>:sa #emphatic
ta<inst>:ta #instrumental
ta<agt>:ta #agent
pa<cl>:pa #classifier
#
#Deictic demonstratives
hing<dem>:hing #this
kha<dem>:kha #that
hue<dem>:hue #that (over there)
khy<dem>:khy #that (up there, above)
khuv<dem>:khuv #that (down there, below)
#
#locative demonstratives
mana<dem>:mana #here
#
#Preverbal deictics
va<dei><and>:va #away from the DC andative, andative
vie<dei><ven>:vie #toward DC, venitive
za<dei><dwn>:za #down toward DC
za<dei><dwn>+a<mid>:zaa
kie<dei><upw>:kie #upward
vya<dei>:vya #[archaic]
#
#
#Questions
ma<qp>:ma #q-particle
ahung<qst>:ahung #who
khaapa<qst>:khaapa #what
khaaning<qst>:khaaning #when
khaalie<qst>:khaalie #where
khaanakaw<qst>:khaanakaw #why

PATTERNS
Adpositions [<nrel>:] > [+lie<loc>:lie]

LEXICON Adpositions
athaa:athaa #near
cung:cung #on top of/above/up
chung:chung #inside of
hnangkaa:hnangkaa #behind
hmie:hmie #in front of
a\tha:a\tha #near/by/next to/beside 	<<<review
raw:raw #below/under/down
alalalie:alalalie #in between
lee:lee #outside of
ale:ale #outside 
#
#

PATTERN Number
Numeral [<num>:]
Classifier [+:] NumeralStem
#sometimes written with spaces in Bible
#but including these probably way over-generates
#Classifier
#NumeralStem

LEXICON NumeralStem
hripa<num>:hripa #zero
kha<num>:kha #one
hning<num>:hning #two
thung<num>:thung #three
paliy<num>:paliy #four
pangaa<num>:pangaa #five
caruv<num>:caruv #six
sariy<num>:sariy #seven
cari<num>:cari #eight
caky<num>:caky #nine
hraa<num>:hraa #ten


##Classifiers
LEXICON Classifier
baw<cl>:baw #box
bi<cl>:bi #cooking pot
buv<cl>:buv
bya<cl>:bya
ce<cl>:ce
che<cl>:che #fractions
chuo<cl>:chuo #generation
cuo<cl>:cuo
cuv<cl>:cuv
daa<cl>:daa
daw<cl>:daw
duo<cl>:duo
diy<cl>:diy
haw<cl>:haw
hla<cl>:hla
hlung<cl>:hlung
hlyi<cl>:hlyi
hmang<cl>:hmang
hmung<cl>:hmung
hnaa<cl>:hnaa
hnie<cl>:hnie
hra<cl>:hra
hrie<cl>:hrie
ing<cl>:ing
kaa<cl>:kaa
kaw<cl>:kaw
kha<cl>:kha
khue<cl>:khue
khuo<cl>:khuo
khuv<cl>:khuv
khy<cl>:khy
kiy<cl>:kiy
kung<cl>:kung #tree
kuo<cl>:kuo
kuv<cl>:kuv
law<cl>:law
le<cl>:le
lu<cl>:lu
lung<cl>:lung
luo<cl>:luo
maw<cl>:maw
me<cl>:me
ming<cl>:ming
muo<cl>:muo
myi<cl>:myi
naw<cl>:naw
nge<cl>:nge
ning<cl>:ning
nuo<cl>:nuo
pa<cl>:pa
pa<cl>:pa
paa<cl>:paa
pang<cl>:pang
phang<cl>:phang
phie<cl>:phie
phyi<cl>:phyi
phung<cl>:phung
phuv<cl>:phuv
pie<cl>:pie
pu<cl>:pu
puv<cl>:puv
pya<cl>:pya
pyi<cl>:pyi
riy<cl>:riy
rung<cl>:rung
ruo<cl>:ruo
ry<cl>:ry
ryi<cl>:ryi
sa<cl>:sa
saw<cl>:saw
siy<cl>:siy
sung<cl>:sung
suo<cl>:suo
suv<cl>:suv
thang<cl>:thang
thaw<cl>:thaw
thla<cl>:thla
thyi<cl>:thyi
ting<cl>:ting
tluo<cl>:tluo
tue<cl>:tue
tung<cl>:tung
tuo<cl>:tuo
uv<cl>:uv
vaa<cl>:vaa
yi<cl>:yi
za<cl>:za
zaa<cl>:zaa
zung<cl>:zung
zuo<cl>:zuo

LEXICON Quantifier
hluv #many
caw #few
palang #all
cicuo #each
hrangpa #another
de #enough
bangkhuo #all

LEXICON PostQuant
sa
tuv
ce
vie
hringhruo
hryly

PATTERNS
[subj<agr><p3><sg>+:a] < Quantifier [<qnt>:]
Quantifier [<qnt>+ta<cnjsub>:ta]
PostQuant [<adv>:] #TODO: tags?

[hluv<qnt>+puv<nmlz>:hluvpuv]


LEXICON Numeral
/([0123456789])+/
/([0123456789])+[.,]([0123456789])+/

LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:?
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


#Resources:
#https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
#https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
#https://github.com/hfst/
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
